Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 3

Barbers

62-3-101. Practice of barbering governed by board of cosmetology and barber examiners — Inspection.

The practice of barbering shall be governed by the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners, created by § 62-4-103 and this chapter.

Inspections of barber shops shall be performed by inspectors provided and supervised by the director of the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners. Annual inspections of barber schools and colleges may be performed by the inspectors or members of the board.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 18; mod. Code 1932, § 7134; Acts 1963, ch. 335, § 1; 1967, ch. 118, § 1; 1979, ch. 379, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-301; Acts 1986, ch. 921, § 1; 1988, ch. 1013, § 27; 2001, ch. 99, § 1; 2010, ch. 934, § 1; 2014, ch. 964, §§ 7, 13.

Compiler's Notes. The state board of cosmetology and barber examiners, created by this section and § 62-4-103, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Acts 2014, ch. 964, § 14 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the board of cosmetology and the board of barber examiners shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon July 1, 2014, simultaneous with the establishment of the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners, created by §§ 62-4-103 and 62-3-101.

Acts 2014, ch. 964, § 15 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that the rules of the board of cosmetology and the rules of the board of barber examiners shall be deemed to be the rules of the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners created by the act, and to the extent that such rules conflict the board shall promulgate new rules to make the application thereof applicable to the respective professions.

Acts 2014, ch. 964, § 16 provided that all records and reports of the respective boards in existence prior to July 1, 2014, shall be transferred to the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners.

Acts 2016, ch. 561, § 3 provides that the division of state audit shall return to the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners in 2017 for the purpose of conducting a question and answer review of the board. The division of state audit shall complete the question and answer review within a period sufficient to allow for its timely review by the government operations joint subcommittee on commerce, labor, transportation, and agriculture.

Cross-References. State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Barbering, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Act Fixing Prices for Barber Work, 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 241.

62-3-102. [Reserved.]

62-3-104. [Reserved.]

Any one (1) or any combination of the following practices, when done for payment, directly or indirectly, or without payment, for the public generally, constitute the practice of barbering:

Shaving or trimming the beard;

Cutting or styling the hair;

Giving facial and scalp massages or treatments with oils, creams, lotions or other preparations either by hand or mechanical appliances;

Singeing, curling, shampooing, coloring, bleaching or straightening the hair or applying hair tonics;

Cutting, fitting, measuring and forming head caps for wigs or hair pieces;

Hair weaving, excluding medical or surgical procedures;

Applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils, clays or lotions to scalp, face, neck or other parts of the body; or

Manicuring and nail care.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 2; Code 1932; § 7119; Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 1; 1975, ch. 206, § 1; 1978, ch. 816, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-306; Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 1; 1986, ch. 921, § 2.

62-3-106. [Reserved.]

No person shall practice or attempt to practice barbering in this state, or serve or attempt to serve as a barber instructor or technician in this state, without a valid certificate of registration issued pursuant to this chapter by the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 7117; Acts 1975, ch. 146, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-307; Acts 1986, ch. 921, § 3; 2014, ch. 964, § 13.

Cross-References. Penalty for violations, § 62-3-130.

Law Reviews.

Power of Administrative Agencies to Compel Testimony in Tennessee (Seymour Samuels, Jr.), 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 928.

62-3-108. Persons exempt.

The following persons are exempt from this chapter while in the proper discharge of their professional duties:

Persons authorized by the law of this state to practice medicine and surgery;

Commissioned medical or surgical officers of the United States army, navy, air force or marine hospital service;

Registered nurses;

Duly registered cosmetologists operating in accordance with chapter 4 of this title; and

Any person whose occupation or practice is confined solely to shampooing, as defined in § 62-4-102.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 4; mod. Code 1932, § 7121; modified; Acts 1975, ch. 146, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-308; Acts 1986, ch. 921, § 4; 2017, ch. 227, § 1.

Cross-References. Exemption from cosmetologists' licensing law, § 62-4-109.

62-3-109. Shop registration, styling, supervision and management — Barbering in other locations.

It is unlawful to operate a barber shop or barber styling shop without a valid certificate of registration issued by the board. Application for the certificate shall be made upon application forms furnished by the board.

Prior to the opening of any new barber or styling shop or change of location of an existing barber or styling shop, an inspector of the board shall inspect and approve the shop. Inspections of shops shall be made within ten (10) days of receipt of a request for an inspection, with the request to be accompanied by payment for the inspection. If the ownership of a shop changes, the new owner may not operate the shop more than thirty (30) days after the date of the change of ownership unless, within the thirty-day period, the new owner submits an application for a license to operate the shop and has paid the proper fees. Any change of location or ownership or new shop shall be reported to the office of the board immediately.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Designated manager” means a person licensed under chapter 3 or chapter 4 of this title in at least one (1) discipline that a shop is licensed to offer who serves in a supervisory or managerial capacity of the shop in the absence of the manager; and

“Manager” means a person licensed under chapter 3 or chapter 4 of this title in at least one (1) discipline that a shop is licensed to offer who serves in a supervisory or managerial capacity in the shop whose information is filed with the board.

Each shop licensed by the board shall designate a manager. The shop shall submit the name and license information of its manager upon application and renewal.

It is unlawful to operate a shop unless it is, at all times, under the direction of a manager or designated manager. While on duty, the manager or designated manager shall be responsible for the shop's compliance with this chapter and the rules of the board. The board may require the name of the shop's manager or designated manager to be posted in such form and location as the board may prescribe.

The manager and designated manager may manage those who practice disciplines in cosmetology or barbering other than the discipline in which the manager or designated manager is licensed; however, the manager or designated manager shall only practice within the field that the person is licensed.

Except as provided in § 62-3-108, it is unlawful to perform any act constituting barbering under § 62-3-105 in any place other than a duly registered barber shop, barber styling shop, barber school or college, licensed funeral establishment, registered mobile shop, nursing home, hospital health facilities or in the residence of the person to whom the services are being rendered pursuant to § 62-3-135.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 1; Code 1932, § 7118; Acts 1980, ch. 703, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-309; Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 2; 1986, ch. 921, §§ 5-7; 1990, ch. 963, § 4; 1996, ch. 895, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 402, § 1; 2016, ch. 838, § 4; 2016, ch. 983, § 2; 2017, ch. 102, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2017, ch. 102, § 3 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for violations, § 62-3-130.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Unemployment Compensation, § 5.

62-3-110. Qualifications for technicians and master barbers.

Any person who desires a certificate of registration as a technician, authorizing the person to apply tints or dyes to the hair, shampoo hair, manicure nails and apply cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils, clays or lotions to scalp, face, neck or other parts of the body, shall submit an application for examination to the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners on the prescribed form.

The application shall be accompanied by proof of satisfactory completion of a course in a registered barber school or college of no less than three hundred forty (340) hours of continuous instruction, including no more than eight (8) hours per day and forty (40) hours per week in the following subjects:

Scientific fundamentals of shampooing, tinting, dyeing, manicuring, the application of cosmetic preparations, hygiene and bacteriology;

Histology of the hair and hair structure; and

Massaging and manipulation of the muscles of the arms, hands and scalp.

The application shall also contain proof that:

The applicant is at least seventeen (17) years of age; and

The applicant has received a high school diploma or, in lieu of a high school diploma, has received a GED(R) or HiSET(R) diploma.

Any person who desires a certificate of registration as a master barber shall submit an application for examination to the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by proof that the applicant:

Is at least seventeen (17) years of age;

Has received a high school diploma or, in lieu of a high school diploma, has received a GED(R) or HiSET(R) diploma; and

Either:

Has satisfactorily completed a course of one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours in a registered barber school or college; or

Holds a valid Tennessee cosmetology license and has completed three hundred (300) hours in a registered barber school or college regarding the fundamentals of straight razor shaving and barbering technique.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 5; Code 1932, § 7122; Acts 1961, ch. 67, § 1; 1967, ch. 249, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 90, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 131, § 1; Acts 1975, ch. 146, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-310; Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 3; 1986, ch. 921, §§ 8, 9; 1996, ch. 895, §§ 3-7; 2014, ch. 964, § 13; 2015, ch. 402, §§ 2, 3; 2017, ch. 226, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-3-111. Duties of owner and manager of shop as to persons performing barbering services and conformance to chapter.

The owner and manager of a shop shall be responsible for ensuring that:

Only persons duly licensed by the board perform barbering services in the shop;

Persons duly licensed by the board perform only those services authorized by their licenses; and

The shop and its operation conform to this chapter and any rules duly promulgated under this chapter.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-3-111 (Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 6; Code 1932, § 7123; Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 2; 1961, ch. 67, § 2; 1965, ch. 267, § 1; 1967, ch. 249, § 2; 1975, ch. 146, § 5; 1979, ch. 379, § 8; 1980, ch. 703, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-311), concerning qualifications for apprentices, was repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 15. Apprentices now licensed as master barbers, see § 62-3-110.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-3-112. Time within which course of instruction to be completed.

A barber student shall have seven (7) years from the date the student originally enrolls in a barbering school to complete the required courses and number of hours required when the student originally enrolls. If the student fails to complete the course of instruction within that time period, the board may require the student to complete additional courses or attain an additional number of hours prior to issuing a license to the person.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former 62-3-112 (Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 7; mod. Code 1932, § 7124; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-312; Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 4), concerning application for examination, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 895, § 14.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-3-113. Examination.

The board shall conduct examinations of applicants for certificates of registration no less than four (4) times each year, at times and places that the board may determine. The examination of an applicant for a certificate of registration as a master barber shall consist of a theory examination and a practical demonstration as determined by the board.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 8; mod. Code 1932, § 7125; Acts 1975, ch. 146, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-313; Acts 1986, ch. 921, § 10; 2016, ch. 991, § 11.

62-3-114. Reciprocity for technicians and barber instructors.

A person who holds a valid license or certificate of registration as a technician or barber instructor under the laws of a state, the District of Columbia, a territorial possession of the United States or a foreign country may be issued a certificate of registration as a technician or barber instructor if the board makes an individual determination that the person has substantially met the qualifications for registration in this state.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 10; mod. Code 1932, § 7127; Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 4; 1965, ch. 267, § 3; 1967, ch. 249, § 3; 1975, ch. 146, §§ 9, 10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-315; T.C.A., § 62-3-115; Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 5; 1986, ch. 921, § 11.

62-3-115. Reciprocity of master barbers.

The board may issue a certificate of registration as a master barber without examination to a nonresident who:

Holds a valid license or certificate of registration as a master barber in another jurisdiction that:

Has substantially the same requirements for licensing or registration of barbers as are contained in this chapter; or

Has entered into a reciprocal agreement with the board permitting licenses or certificates of registration to be issued without examination to master barbers resident in and registered by this state;

Proves by sworn affidavits that the nonresident has continuously and lawfully practiced as a barber in another jurisdiction for the immediately preceding five (5) years; or

Has held a military occupational skill (MOS) rating in a branch of the military service for two (2) or more years that required the person to perform the duties of a barber.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 10; mod. Code 1932, § 7127; Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 4; 1961, ch. 214, § 1; 1963, ch. 349, § 1; 1965, ch. 267, § 2; 1967, ch. 249, § 3; 1975, ch. 146, §§ 7, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-314; T.C.A., § 62-3-114; Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 6; 1986, ch. 921, §§ 12, 13; 1988, ch. 674, § 2; 2001, ch. 99, § 2; 2016, ch. 838, § 8.

62-3-116. Issuance of certificate.

Whenever this chapter has been complied with, the board shall issue a certificate of registration.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 9; Code 1932, § 7126; Acts 1975, ch. 146, § 11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-316.

62-3-117. Retired inactive licenses.

Any person licensed under this chapter may retire the license by submitting a form prescribed by the board accompanied by the current active license certificate and a fee in an amount set by rules promulgated by the board. Upon receipt of an acceptable application to retire the license, the board shall issue a retired inactive license certificate to the retiree. The holder of a retired license shall not be entitled to engage in the practice of barbering until the person's license is reactivated in a manner approved by the board.

Acts 1996, ch. 657, § 1; 2015, ch. 402, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-3-117 (Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 3; Code 1932, § 7120; Acts 1975, ch. 146, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-318), concerning apprentice barbers, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 921, § 25. See § 62-3-110.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-3-118. Display of certificate.

Every holder of a certificate of registration shall:

Display the certificate in a conspicuous place adjacent to or near the holder's work chair; and

Promptly notify the board of any change of mailing address within thirty (30) calendar days of such change.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 12; Code 1932, § 7128; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-319; Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for failure to display, § 62-3-130.

62-3-119. Renewal or restoration of registration.

Certificates of registration of master barbers, technicians and instructors shall be subject to renewal or restoration in accordance with § 62-3-129.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 13; mod. Code 1932, § 7129; Acts 1961, ch. 64, § 1; 1967, ch. 249, § 4; 1975, ch. 146, § 13; 1978, ch. 817, § 1; 1980, ch. 703, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-320; Acts 1986, ch. 921, § 14.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules concerning certain license renewal dates, § 56-1-302.

62-3-120. Automatic renewal for inductees in armed forces.

The certificate of registration of any barber, barber instructor or technician who is inducted into the armed forces of the United States shall be automatically renewed at no charge for the duration of period of service.

Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 7a (Williams, § 7129.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-321; Acts 1986, ch. 921, § 15.

62-3-121. Ground for refusal, suspension or revocation of certificate.

The board may either refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke any certificate of registration for any one (1) or combination of the following causes:

Conviction of a felony for the commission of an offense that bears directly on the person's fitness to practice competently, as determined by the board;

Gross malpractice or gross incompetency;

Continued practice by a person knowingly having an infectious or contagious disease;

Advertising by means of knowingly false or deceptive statements;

Habitual drunkenness or habitual addiction to the use of morphine, cocaine or other habit-forming drug;

Immoral or unprofessional conduct; or

A violation of this chapter or any rules adopted under this chapter.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 14; Code 1932, § 7130; modified; Acts 1979, ch. 379, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-322; Acts 1982, ch. 870, §§ 7, 8; 1986, ch. 921, § 16; 2015, ch. 333, § 1; 2016, ch. 719, § 3; 2018, ch. 745, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 333, § 2, provided that the act, which amended (1), shall apply to actions by the board on or after April 28, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 719, § 11 provided that this act, which amended this section, shall take effect on April 6, 2016 and shall apply to actions instituted by state entities on or after April 6, 2016.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

62-3-122. Barber schools — Certificate required.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to own, operate or conduct a barber school or college of barbering without a certificate of registration issued by the board and paying the fee required for registration as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 3 (Williams, § 7123); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-325.

62-3-123. Certification of barbering schools — Instructions — Services — Reporting.

Any person, firm or corporation desiring a certificate of registration to own, operate or conduct a barber school or college of barbering shall submit an application to the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners on the prescribed form. In order to be eligible to receive the certificate, the applicant must:

Require, as a prerequisite to graduation, a course of no less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours of continuous instruction, including no more than ten (10) hours per day, six (6) days per week, or forty-eight (48) hours per week, in the following subjects:

Scientific fundamentals of barbering, hygiene and bacteriology, histology of the hair, skin, muscles and nerves;

Structure of the head, face and neck;

Elementary chemistry relating to sterilization and antiseptic;

Diseases of the skin, hair and glands;

Massaging and manipulating of the muscles; and

All of the practices of barbering included in § 62-3-105;

Provide at least one (1) registered barber instructor or barber instructor assistant for every fifteen (15) students enrolled; and

Provide a true and exact copy of the standard contract that each prospective student shall be required to execute for enrollment.

No barber student may render clinical services on patrons until the student has completed at least one hundred (100) hours of instruction.

No barber school or college may operate without the presence of a registered barber instructor.

A school shall employ at least one (1) licensed barber instructor for each barber instructor assistant who shall be under the personal supervision of the licensed barber instructor.

Each school, including any public school conducting a vocational education program in the field of barbering, shall:

Keep a daily record of the attendance of each student enrolled; and

Submit to the board on the prescribed form a monthly progress report on each student enrolled.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the board shall promulgate rules enabling a barber school or college to develop courses of instruction pursuant to subsection (a) that require a student to earn:

Fifty percent (50%) of the hours needed for a specific certificate of registration pursuant to §§ 62-3-110 and 62-3-124, from classroom instruction in a registered barber school or college; and

Fifty percent (50%) of the hours needed for a specific certificate of registration pursuant to §§ 62-3-110 and 62-3-124, from apprenticing under the supervision of a person:

Who has a certificate of registration issued under §§ 62-3-110 and 62-3-124;

Who has at least ten (10) years of experience; and

Who is in good standing with the board.

Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 3 (Williams, § 7123); 1965, ch. 267, § 4; 1967, ch. 249, § 5; 1971, ch. 346, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-326; Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 9; 1986, ch. 921, §§ 17-19; 1988, ch. 674, § 3; 1990, ch. 963, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 895, § 9; 2014, ch. 863, § 1; 2014, ch. 964, § 13; 2015, ch. 402, §§ 6, 7; 2016, ch. 991, §§ 1, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 863, § 4, effective May 1, 2014, and expiring June 30, 2015, provided that the board of barber examiners may promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of Section 1 of this act, which added former subsection (e) to this section. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-3-124. Instructors — Certificates of registration — Continuing education.

The board shall issue a certificate of registration as a barber instructor to a person who:

Files an application with the board in the form that the board may prescribe, accompanied by the examination fee required by § 62-3-129;

Holds a valid certificate of registration as a master barber and has been duly registered as a master barber for a period of at least three (3) consecutive years prior to filing an application to be an instructor;

Has completed the twelfth grade in an accredited school or the equivalent;

Completes an examination prescribed by the board; and

For all applications submitted on or after July 1, 2017, completes a three-hundred-hour instructor training program at a board-certified barber school; or

Files an application with the board on or before June 30, 2017, in a form prescribed by the board, accompanied by the examination fee required by § 62-3-129;

Holds a valid certificate of registration as a master barber and has completed a four-hundred-fifty-hour instructor training program at a board-certified barber school;

Has completed the twelfth grade in an accredited school or the equivalent; and

Completes an examination prescribed by the board.

After registration, each barber instructor shall biennially submit to the board satisfactory proof of attendance in a barber instructor training program of at least sixteen (16) hours' duration, approved by the board; however, the board may, in its discretion, grant up to one (1) additional year for submission of such proof when an instructor satisfactorily demonstrates a medical hardship, a death in the immediate family or entitlement to automatic renewal of registration under § 62-3-120.

A certificate of registration as a barber instructor shall become invalid if the registrant:

Ceases to hold a valid certificate of registration as a master barber; or

Fails to comply with subsection (b).

The board shall issue a certificate of registration as a barber instructor assistant to a person who:

Files an application with the board in the form that the board may prescribe accompanied by the fee required by § 62-3-129;

Holds a valid certificate of registration as a master barber and is currently enrolled in a four hundred fifty-hour instructor training program at a board-certified barber school; and

Has completed the tenth grade in an accredited school or the equivalent.

A barber instructor assistant shall not be employed as such for more than three (3) years.

All certificates or renewals of certificates shall expire on September 1 and shall become invalid thereafter.

Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 3 (Williams, § 7123); Acts 1965, ch. 267, § 5; 1967, ch. 177, § 1; 1967, ch. 249, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 161, § 3; Acts 1980, ch. 703, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-327; Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 10; 1984, ch. 547, § 1; 1986, ch. 921, §§ 20, 21; 1990, ch. 963, § 3; 1996, ch. 895, §§ 10, 11; 2001, ch. 99, § 3; 2014, ch. 964, § 13; 2015, ch. 402, § 8; 2016, ch. 991, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Instructor examination and certificate of registration fees, § 62-3-129.

62-3-125. Signs displayed by schools.

No barber school or college shall be allowed to display a barber pole or any other sign customarily used by a barber shop, but must have a sign with letters no less than five inches (5") high indicating barber school or college and shall display a sign indicating that the work there is done by students exclusively.

Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 3 (Williams, § 7123); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-328.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Barbering, § 1.

62-3-126. Payments to students — Business for profit prohibited.

No barber school or college shall be approved by the board that will pay any wages, commissions or gratuities of any kind to barber students for barber work while in training or while enrolled as students in the school or college, and no barber business for profit shall be operated by or in connection with any barber school or college.

Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 3 (Williams, § 7123); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-329.

62-3-127. Suspension or revocation of school certificate.

The board has the authority to revoke or suspend the certificate of registration of any barber school or college of barbering for failure to comply with the requirements set out in this chapter.

Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 3 (Williams, § 7123); Acts 1980, ch. 451, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-330.

62-3-128. Rules and regulations — Enforcement powers of board.

The board has the authority to make reasonable rules and regulations for the administration of this chapter and prescribe sanitary requirements for barber shops and barber schools, subject to the approval of the department of health.

Barber shops and barber schools are subject to inspection at any time during business hours.

A copy of the rules and regulations adopted by the board shall be furnished by it to the owner or manager of each barber shop and barber school, and the copy shall be posted in a conspicuous place in each barber shop or barber school.

The results of any inspection of a barber shop or barber school may be reduced to a grade or rating by the inspector in accordance with general regulations of the board. The grade or rating shall be furnished to the shop or school and posted in a conspicuous place in the shop or school.

Each barber school, college or shop shall be inspected at least annually.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 20; mod. Code 1932, § 7138; Acts 1965, ch. 268, § 1; 1979, ch. 379, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-331; Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 11; 1986, ch. 921, § 22.

62-3-129. Fees and penalties — Late renewal — System of renewals.

The board shall prescribe fees, late fees and penalties, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for all permits, certificates and registrations issued pursuant to this chapter.

All certificates of registration for master barbers and barber instructors shall expire biennially on the anniversary of the original date of licensure.

All certificates of registration for barber shops shall expire biennially on the anniversary of the original date of licensure.

All certificates of registration for technicians shall expire biennially on the anniversary of the original date of licensure.

All certificates of registration for barber schools and colleges shall expire annually on the anniversary of the original date of licensure.

All certificates of registration for master barbers, barber instructors, technicians, barber shops and barber schools and colleges may be renewed up until one (1) year from the expiration date of the certificate of registration upon the payment of the specified fees and penalties.

A certificate of registration for a master barber that has been expired for more than one (1) year but less than three (3) years may be reinstated upon payment of twice the fees that would have been collected for the timely and continuous renewal of the certificate. For the reinstatement of a certificate of registration for a master barber license that has been expired for more than three (3) years, a new application for examination and the examination fee shall be submitted. If successful, the applicant shall pay the specified license fee. The examination shall consist of a practical examination before the board. The applicant shall not be required to meet the qualifications for a certificate of registration established in § 62-3-110(b)(2) and (3).

For the reinstatement of a certificate of registration for a technician that has been expired for more than one (1) year, a new application and the examination fee shall be submitted. If successful, the applicant shall pay the specified license fee. The examination shall consist of a practical examination before the board. The applicant shall not be required to meet the qualifications for a certificate of registration established in § 62-3-110(a).

For the reinstatement of the certificate of registration for a barber instructor that has been expired for more than one (1) year, the applicant shall pay a fee of twice the amount that would have been collected for timely and continuous renewal of the certificate.

For the reinstatement of the certificate of registration for a barber shop that has been expired for more than one (1) year, the applicant shall pay a fee of twice the amount that would have been collected for timely and continuous renewal of the certificate.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 16; Code 1932, § 7132; Acts 1951, ch. 231, § 5; 1963, ch. 348, §§ 1-4; 1965, ch. 268, § 2; 1967, ch. 249, § 7; 1971, ch. 396, § 1; 1975, ch. 146, §§ 14-16; 1975, ch. 206, § 2; 1978, ch. 816, § 2; 1978, ch. 935, §§ 1-3; 1979, ch. 379, §§ 6, 7; 1981, ch. 158, § 1; 1981, ch. 416, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-332; Acts 1982, ch. 870, §§ 12, 13; 1984, ch. 547, § 2; 1986, ch. 921, § 23; 1988, ch. 674, §§ 4, 5; 1989, ch. 360, § 3; 1989, ch. 523, § 108; 1990, ch. 1026, § 37; 2001, ch. 99, §§ 4-6; 2015, ch. 402, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Renewal of registrations, § 62-3-119.

62-3-130. Penalty for violations.

Each of the following constitutes a Class B misdemeanor:

The violation of any of the provisions of this chapter;

Permitting any person under one's supervision or control to engage in any practice of barbering without a valid certificate of registration issued by the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners;

Obtaining or attempting to obtain a certificate of registration for money other than the required fee or any other thing of value or by fraudulent misrepresentations;

Practicing or attempting to practice by fraudulent misrepresentations;

The willful failure to display a certificate of registration as required by § 62-3-118; and

Failure to comply with a lawful order of the board.

Acts 1929, ch. 118, § 17; Code 1932, § 7133; Acts 1965, ch. 268, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-333; Acts 1982, ch. 870, § 14; 1986, ch. 921, § 24; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1996, ch. 895, § 12; 2014, ch. 964, § 13; 2015, ch. 402, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

62-3-131. [Reserved.]

No animals, except service animals, fish for decorative purposes, and birds in cages, shall be permitted in any barber shop. Bird cages in barber shops shall be cleaned daily. Departmental inspectors shall ensure bird cages are cleaned sufficiently to prevent any hazard to human health or well-being.

Acts 2010, ch. 704, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1999, ch. 156, § 2 provided that the repeal of a former version of this section, concerning special licenses for certain barbers with long service, shall not be construed as prohibiting or denying the authority of a person issued a valid, special certificate of registration to engage in the practice of barbering and to operate a barber shop at the location specified in § 62-3-132 prior to May 14, 1999. Section 2 further provided that the repeal of this section shall not be construed as prohibiting such person to renew such license, if renewal is required by the board of barber examiners (now the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners), to continue the practice of barbering and operating a barber shop at such location until such time as such person voluntarily surrenders such special certificate of registration.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-3-132 (Acts 1965, ch. 267, § 6; T.C.A., § 62-335), concerning exemption from regulation of students and schools involved in vocational rehabilitation programs, was repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 870.

Former § 62-3-132 (Acts 1996, ch. 895, § 13), concerning special licenses for certain barbers with long service, was repealed by Acts 1999, ch. 156, § 1, effective May 14, 1999.

62-3-133. Provisions governing hearings and judicial review.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 451, § 11; T.C.A., § 62-336.